Missouri, session 2026, HB2587.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 577.800, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
577.800, 589.900, and 589.902, to read as follows:
577.800. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
use of unmanned aircraft over an open-air facility or
critical infrastructure facility if he or she purposely:
(1) Operates an unmanned aircraft within a vertical
distance of four hundred feet from the ground and within the
property line of an open-air facility; [or]
(2) Uses an unmanned aircraft with the purpose of
delivering to a person within an open-air facility any
object described in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 4
of this section;
(3) Uses an unmanned aircraft within the boundary of
any critical infrastructure facility; or
(4) Operates an unmanned aircraft within a vertical
distance of four hundred feet from the ground and within the
property line of a critical infrastructure facility in
furtherance of any violation of criminal law.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS HCS HB 2587 2
2. For purposes of this section, "open-air facility"
shall mean any sports, theater, music, performing arts, or
other entertainment facility with a capacity of five
[thousand] hundred people or more and not completely
enclosed by a roof or other structure. For purposes of this
section, "critical infrastructure facility" shall have the
same meaning as section 569.086.
3. The provisions of this section shall not prohibit
the operation of an unmanned aircraft by:
(1) An employee, owner, or operator of an open-air
facility [at the direction of the president or chief
executive officer of the open-air facility] or critical
infrastructure facility for the purpose of monitoring,
inspecting, operating, or maintaining the facility;
(2) A person who has written consent from the
president or chief executive officer of the open-air
facility or critical infrastructure facility;
(3) An employee of a law enforcement agency, fire
department, or emergency medical service in the exercise of
official duties;
(4) A government official or employee in the exercise
of official duties;
(5) A public utility or a rural electric cooperative
if:
(a) The unmanned aircraft is used for the purpose of
inspecting, repairing, or maintaining utility transmission
or distribution lines or other utility equipment or
infrastructure;
(b) The utility or cooperative notifies the open-air
facility or critical infrastructure facility before flying
the unmanned aircraft, except during an emergency; and

SCS HCS HB 2587 3
(c) The person operating the unmanned aircraft does
not physically enter the prohibited space without an escort
provided by the open-air facility or critical infrastructure
facility; or
(6) An employee of a railroad in the exercise of
official duties on any land owned or operated by a railroad
corporation regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration.
4. The offense of unlawful use of unmanned aircraft
over an open-air facility or critical infrastructure
facility shall be punishable as an infraction unless the
person uses an unmanned aircraft for:
(1) Delivering a gun, knife, weapon, or other article,
including any explosive device or material, that may be used
in such manner to endanger the life of an employee or guest
at an open-air facility or critical infrastructure facility,
in which case the offense is a class B felony; or
(2) Delivering a controlled substance, as that term is
defined under section 195.010, in which case the offense is
a class D felony.
5. Each open-air facility or critical infrastructure
facility shall post a sign warning of the provisions of this
section. The sign shall be at least eleven inches by
fourteen inches and posted in a conspicuous place.
6. This section shall not apply to an operator of an
unmanned aircraft that is being used for a commercial
purpose that is otherwise operating lawfully, provided the
operator is authorized by the Federal Aviation
Administration to conduct lawful operations in that airspace.
589.900. 1. For the purposes of sections 589.900 to
589.902, the following terms mean:
(1) "Authorized individuals", peace officers, as
defined in section 590.010, who are certified in accordance

SCS HCS HB 2587 4
with federal requirements, including the Homeland Security
Act of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended, when applicable,
to conduct unmanned aircraft and unmanned aerial system
mitigation;
(2) "Mitigate", any of the following actions:
(a) During the operation of an unmanned aircraft
system, to detect, identify, monitor, or track the unmanned
aircraft system or unmanned aircraft, without prior consent,
including by means of intercept or other access of a wire
communication, an oral communication, or an electronic
communication used to control the unmanned aircraft system
or unmanned aircraft;
(b) To warn the operator of the unmanned aircraft
system or unmanned aircraft, including by passive or active
and direct or indirect physical, electronic, radio, or
electromagnetic means, or through the use of remote
identification broadcast or other means;
(c) To disrupt control of the unmanned aircraft system
or unmanned aircraft, without prior consent, including by
disabling the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft
by intercepting, interfering, or causing interference with
wire, oral, electronic, or radio communications used to
control the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft;
(d) To seize or exercise control of the unmanned
aircraft system or unmanned aircraft; or
(e) To use reasonable force, if necessary, to disable,
damage, or destroy the unmanned aircraft system or unmanned
aircraft.
2. The terms "unmanned aircraft" and "unmanned
aircraft system" shall have the meanings given such terms in
49 U.S.C. Section 44801.

SCS HCS HB 2587 5
589.902. 1. To the greatest extent permissible under
applicable federal law, including the Homeland Security Act
of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended, authorized individuals
in this state shall be empowered to take necessary action to
mitigate a credible threat that an unmanned aircraft or
unmanned aircraft system poses to the safety or security of
people, facilities, assets, a venue or set of venues used
for large-scale public gatherings or events, critical
infrastructure, or correctional facilities.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
the power of a law enforcement officer in this state to
seize an unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft in
the course of their duties. A law enforcement officer may
use all lawful means to effect such a seizure, which may
include the use of mitigation techniques where permissible.
3. Any unmanned aircraft system or unmanned aircraft
seized under this section or in connection with a criminal
act shall be subject to forfeiture under section 513.607.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
permit the jamming of or interference with any signal,
except in accordance with all applicable federal laws,
rules, and regulations, including, but not limited to, the
Homeland Security Act of 2002, Pub. L. 107-296, as amended.
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to
address the urgent need of Missouri law enforcement agencies
to be able to ensure and provide for the safety and security
of Missouri residents from the threat that weaponized
unmanned aircraft systems present to Missouri, the enactment
of sections 589.900 and 589.902 and the repeal and
reenactment of section 577.800 of this act are deemed
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared

SCS HCS HB 2587 6
to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
constitution, and the enactment of sections 589.900 and
589.902 and the repeal and reenactment of section 577.800 of
this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage
and approval.
✓